Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.70.040

Appointment, removal of commissioners.

(1) The governor shall appoint the members, for this state, of the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education, which is created under the provisions of Article III of the western regional higher education compact.

(2) The qualifications and terms of office of the members of the commission for this state shall conform with the provisions of Article IV of said compact.

(3) The commissioners shall serve without compensation and they shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses by the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education.

(4) The governor may remove a member of the commission in conformity with the provisions of RCW 43.06.070, 43.06.080 and 43.06.090.

[ 1981 c 338 s 14; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.70.040. Prior: 1955 c 214 s 4. Formerly RCW 28.82.040.]